Washington statutes.
RCW 7.52.040

Notice.

The notice shall be directed by name to all the tenants in common, who are known, and in the same manner to all lien creditors who are made parties to the suit, and generally to all persons unknown, having or claiming an interest or estate in the property.

[Code 1881 s 555; 1877 p 117 s 560; 1869 p 133 s 508; RRS s 841.]